District of Columbia statutes.
3-416

Change of address of licensee.

(a)

Any person holding a funeral director’s license or an apprentice funeral director’s license shall, within 5 days after any change of business or residence address, notify the Mayor in writing of the change.

(b)

Any person holding a funeral services establishment license shall, within 5 days after any change of ownership or percentage of ownership, or location of establishment, notify the Mayor in writing of the change.

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 17, 31 DCR 1815
1981 Ed., § 2-2816.